Hawaii statutes.
§141-9 Energy feedstock program. (a)
There is established within the department of agriculture an energy feedstock
program that shall:

(1) Maintain cognizance of actions taken by industry
and by federal, state, county, and private agencies in activities relating to
the production of energy feedstock, and promote and support worthwhile energy
feedstock production activities in the State;

(2) Serve as an information clearinghouse for energy
feedstock production activities;

(3) Coordinate development projects to investigate
and solve biological and technical problems involved in raising selected
species with commercial energy generating potential;

(4) Actively seek federal funding for energy
feedstock production activities;

(5) Undertake activities required to develop and
expand the energy feedstock production industry; and

(6) Perform other functions and activities as may be
assigned by law, including monitoring the compliance provisions under section
205-4.5(a)(16).

(b) The chairperson of the board of
agriculture shall consult and coordinate with the energy resources coordinator
under chapter 196 to establish milestones and objectives for the production of
energy feedstock that is grown in the State. The chairperson and the
coordinator shall report the State's progress toward meeting such milestones
and objectives annually to the legislature.

(c) The chairperson of the board of
agriculture shall also consult and coordinate with research programs and
activities at the University of Hawaii that will assist in the further growth
and promotion of the energy feedstock production industry in Hawaii.

(d) The chairperson of the board of
agriculture may employ temporary staff exempt from chapters 76 and 89. The
board may adopt rules pursuant to chapter 91 to effectuate the purposes of this
section. [L 2007, c 159, §5; am L 2012, c 329, §2]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next